Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-931
Recovery; authorized.

The department is authorized to recover all amounts paid or to be paid to state benefit programs as a result of failure to coordinate benefits by a licensed insurer or a self-funded insurer.

Laws 2005, LB 589, § 6;

R.S.Supp.,2005, § 68-10,105;

Laws 2006, LB 1248, § 31;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 259.